Rhode Island statutes. Title 24 Highways
Chapter 9 Storm Emergency Account

24-9-1.
Purpose of chapter.

While appropriations adequate to meet the normal average needs of the department of transportation in the performance of its duties relating to maintenance of roads and related matters are annually made in legislation appropriating funds for each fiscal year, the general assembly recognizes the necessity for anticipating and making advance provision to care for the unusual and extraordinary burdens imposed on the department by reason of extreme climatic phenomena and other emergencies. For these purposes, it is the intention of the general assembly to forearm the department, vesting it with adequate power and authority within the limitation of available funds in the storm emergency account to meet any such emergency.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1644, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

24-9-1

.

24-9-2.
Emergency account established.

There is hereby established a special account to be known as the storm emergency account. The governor may from time to time in the event of any emergency, within the purview of this chapter, allocate funds to the account, which shall be available for expenditure in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1644, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

24-9-2

.

24-9-3.
Emergency expenditures.

Whenever any extreme climatic phenomena or other unpredictable emergency shall in the considered judgment of the director of transportation, impose upon the department of transportation extraordinary duties relating to maintenance of roads or related matters, not foreseeable by the director at the time of submitting budget estimates for the department, the director may meet such emergencies by employing for the duration of the emergencies additional personnel, and by hiring or otherwise acquiring all necessary appliances and equipment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1644, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

24-9-3

.

24-9-4.
Payments from emergency account.

All obligations and expenses incurred by the director in the exercise of the powers and duties vested in the director by the foregoing provisions of this chapter shall be paid by the general treasurer out of available funds in the storm emergency account; and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the sum, or so much thereof as may be required, upon receipt by the state controller of proper vouchers duly approved by the director of transportation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1644, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

24-9-4

.

24-9-5.
Liberal construction — Powers additional.

The provisions of this chapter shall be liberally construed in order to accomplish the purposes hereof and to permit the director to adequately cope with any emergency which may arise, as provided in this chapter; and the powers herein vested in the director of transportation shall be construed as being in addition to all other powers presently vested in him or her, and not in derogation of any existing powers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1644, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

24-9-5

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 61.